Utah statutes.
53-2a-508.   Chapter takes effect when Idaho provisions enacted.

(1)  This chapter takes effect when statutory provisions are enacted by Idaho that are reciprocal to the provisions of this part.

(2)  This part remains in effect as long as the statutory provisions enacted by Idaho under Subsection (1) are in effect.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

